Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-3808
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.

Laws 2025, LB21, § 8.